Utah statutes.
70-3a-502.   Use of funds collected under this chapter.
Notwithstanding Subsections 13-1-2(3)(c) and 70-3a-203(2)(c), any funds
collected from the registration of a mark under this chapter or the use of the
database in excess of the expense of maintaining the database shall be
retained as dedicated credits to be used by the division to:
(1)  promote the electronic registration of marks to holders of federal
trademarks;
(2)  promote the state as a desirable location for business; and
(3)  provide incentives to businesses considering relocation to the state.
